Washington statutes.
RCW 39.48.020

Amortization—Requirements relaxed.

It shall be proper to provide with respect to any bonds now required to be amortized as provided by *RCW 39.44.010 through 39.44.080, that such amortized annual maturities shall commence to be payable at any time on or before five years from the date of said bonds, and that any bonds, or any part thereof, issued under the authority of this chapter, shall be redeemable prior to their fixed maturities, as provided by the governing board or authority of any such issuer.

[ 1933 ex.s. c 30 s 2; RRS s 5583-12.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 39.44.010, 39.44.011, 39.44.020, 39.44.030, 39.44.060, and 39.44.080 were repealed by 1984 c 186 s 70.